Illinois, session 104th, HB1766.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 5Section 26-8 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/26-8 new)7    Sec. 26-8. Publication of photographs or video recordings 8of crimes being committed prohibited; exceptions.9    (a) In this Section:10    "Internet" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1116-0.1. 12    "Live video" and "video record" have the meanings ascribed 13to them in Section 26-4. 14    "Social media site" means an Internet website where users 15are able to share and generate content, and find and connect 16with other users of common interests.17    (b) A person commits unlawful publication of criminal 18activity when he or she knowingly makes a video record or live 19video of a crime while the crime is being committed and 20transmits or uploads the video record or live video of the 21crime to a social media site.22    (c) This Section does not apply to law enforcement 23agencies or officers, businesses, or other persons who post   HB1766- 2 -LRB104 07774 RLC 17819 b1the video record or live video for its evidentiary value in a 2civil or criminal proceeding arising from the posting of the 3video record or live video of the crime or for seeking 4identification of the person alleged to be committing the 5crime in the video record or live video.6    (d) Sentence. A person who commits unlawful publication of 7criminal activity shall be sentenced to the same penalty as 8the penalty for the crime being transmitted or uploaded to a 9social media site.